Hawaii statutes.
[§435C-7] Appeals and judicial review.
Any applicant to the plan, any person insured pursuant to this chapter, or
their representatives, or any affected insurer, may appeal to the insurance
commissioner within thirty days after any ruling, action or decision by or on
behalf of the plan, with respect to those items the plan of operation defines
as appealable matters.

All orders of the insurance commissioner made
pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to judicial review as provided in
section 431:14-118. [L 1975, c 161, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Section "431:14-118" substituted for
"431-705".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next